Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2046.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5909XS (2) 91 je/js S.F. 2046 DIVISION I 1 WAGE PAYMENT COLLECTION 2 Section 1. Section 91A.5, subsection 1, unnumbered 3 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 4 An employer shall have the burden to establish that a 5 deduction from employee wages is lawful. An employer shall not 6 withhold or divert any portion of an employeeâs wages unless: 7 Sec. 2. Section 91A.5, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2026, 8 is amended to read as follows: 9 b. The employer has obtains advance written authorization 10 from the employee to so deduct for any lawful purpose accruing 11 to the benefit of the employee. 12 Sec. 3. Section 91A.6, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. An employer shall after being notified by the director 15 pursuant to subsection 2 do the following : 16 a. Notify its employees in writing at the time of hiring 17 what wages and regular paydays are designated by the employer. 18 b. Notify its employees in writing whose wages are 19 determined based on a task, piece, mile, or load basis about 20 the method used to calculate wages and when the wages are 21 earned by the employees. 22 b. c. Notify, at least one pay period prior to the 23 initiation of any changes, its employees of any changes in 24 the arrangements specified in this subsection 1 that reduce 25 wages or alter the regular paydays. The notice shall either 26 be in writing or posted at a place where employee notices are 27 routinely posted. 28 c. d. Make available to its employees upon written request, 29 a written statement enumerating employment agreements and 30 policies with regard to vacation pay, sick leave, reimbursement 31 for expenses, retirement benefits, severance pay, or other 32 comparable matters with respect to wages. Notice of such 33 availability shall be given to each employee in writing or by a 34 notice posted at a place where employee notices are routinely 35 -1- LSB 5909XS (2) 91 je/js 1/ 9 S.F. 2046 posted. 1 d. e. Establish, maintain, and preserve for three 2 calendar years the payroll records showing the hours worked, 3 wages earned, and deductions made for each employee and 4 any employment agreements entered into between an employer 5 and employee. Failure to do so shall raise a rebuttable 6 presumption that the employer did not pay the required minimum 7 wage under section 91D.1. 8 Sec. 4. Section 91A.6, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 9 by striking the subsection. 10 Sec. 5. Section 91A.6, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 11 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 12 following: 13 4. a. On each regular payday, the employer shall provide 14 to each employee a statement showing the wages earned by 15 the employee, the deductions made for the employee, and the 16 following information, as applicable: 17 (1) For each employee paid in whole or in part on an hourly 18 basis, the statement shall show the hours the employee worked. 19 (2) For each employee paid based on a percentage of sales or 20 based on a percentage of revenue generated for the employer, 21 the statement shall include a list of the amount of each sale 22 or the amount of revenue during the pay period. 23 (3) For each employee whose pay is based on the number 24 of miles or loads performed, the statement shall include the 25 applicable number performed during the pay period. 26 b. The employer shall provide the statement using one of the 27 following methods: 28 (1) Sending the statement to an employee by mail. 29 (2) Providing the statement to an employee by secure 30 electronic transmission or by other secure electronic means. 31 If an employee is unable to receive the statement by this 32 method, the employee shall notify the employer in writing at 33 least one pay period in advance, and the employer shall provide 34 the statement by one of the other methods listed in this 35 -2- LSB 5909XS (2) 91 je/js 2/ 9 S.F. 2046 paragraph âbâ . 1 (3) Providing the statement to the employee at the 2 employeeâs normal place of employment during normal employment 3 hours. 4 (4) Providing each employee access to view a statement 5 of the employeeâs earnings electronically and providing the 6 employee free and unrestricted access to a printer to print the 7 statement. 8 Sec. 6. Section 91A.8, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 91A.8 Damages recoverable by an employee. 11 When it has been shown that an employer has intentionally 12 failed to pay an employee wages or reimburse expenses pursuant 13 to section 91A.3 , whether as the result of a wage dispute or 14 otherwise, the employer shall be liable to the employee for 15 any the unpaid wages or unreimbursed expenses that are so 16 intentionally failed to be paid or reimbursed , plus liquidated 17 damages, court costs , and any attorneyâs attorney fees incurred 18 in recovering the unpaid wages or unreimbursed expenses 19 and determined to have been usual and necessary. In other 20 instances the employer shall be liable only for unpaid wages or 21 expenses, court costs and usual and necessary attorneyâs fees 22 incurred in recovering the unpaid wages or expenses. 23 Sec. 7. Section 91A.9, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 24 to read as follows: 25 3. The director may employ such qualified personnel as are 26 necessary for the enforcement of this chapter . Such personnel 27 shall be employed pursuant to chapter 8A, subchapter IV . The 28 director shall employ wage investigators for the enforcement of 29 this chapter. 30 Sec. 8. Section 91A.10, subsections 1 and 5, Code 2026, are 31 amended to read as follows: 32 1. Upon the written complaint of the employee involved, the 33 director may shall determine whether wages have not been paid 34 and may constitute an enforceable claim. If for any reason the 35 -3- LSB 5909XS (2) 91 je/js 3/ 9 S.F. 2046 director decides not to make such determination, the director 1 shall so notify the complaining employee within fourteen days 2 of receipt of the complaint. The director shall otherwise 3 notify the employee of such determination within a reasonable 4 time and if it is determined that there is an enforceable 5 claim, the director shall, with the consent of the complaining 6 employee, take an assignment in trust for the wages and for 7 any claim for liquidated damages without being bound by any of 8 the technical rules respecting the validity of the assignment. 9 However, the director shall not accept any complaint for unpaid 10 wages and liquidated damages after one year three years from 11 the date the wages became due and payable. 12 5. An employer shall not discharge or in any other manner 13 discriminate against any employee because the employee has 14 filed a complaint, assigned a claim, or brought an action under 15 this section or has cooperated in bringing any action against 16 an employer. 17 5. a. An employer or other person shall not discharge or 18 in any other manner discriminate or retaliate against any of 19 the following: 20 (1) An employee or other person for exercising any right 21 provided under this chapter or any rules adopted pursuant to 22 this chapter. 23 (2) Another employee or person for providing assistance to 24 an employee or providing information regarding the employee or 25 person. 26 (3) Another employee or person for testifying or planning 27 to testify in any investigation or proceeding regarding the 28 employee or person. 29 b. Taking adverse action against an employee or other person 30 within ninety days of an employeeâs or other personâs engaging 31 in any of the activities in paragraph âaâ raises a presumption 32 that such action was retaliation, which may be rebutted by 33 evidence that such action was taken for other permissible 34 reasons. 35 -4- LSB 5909XS (2) 91 je/js 4/ 9 S.F. 2046 c. Any employee may file a complaint with the director 1 alleging discharge , or discrimination , or retaliation within 2 thirty days after such violation occurs. Upon receipt of the 3 complaint, the director shall cause an investigation to be made 4 to the extent deemed appropriate. If the director determines 5 from the investigation that the provisions of this subsection 6 have been violated, the director shall bring an action in the 7 appropriate district court against such person. The district 8 court shall have jurisdiction, for cause shown, to restrain 9 violations of this subsection and order all appropriate relief 10 including rehiring or reinstatement of the employee to the 11 former position with back pay. 12 Sec. 9. Section 91A.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. A civil action to enforce subsection 5 15 may also be maintained in any court of competent jurisdiction 16 by the director or by any party injured by a violation of 17 subsection 5. An employer or other person who retaliates 18 against an employee or other person in violation of subsection 19 5 shall be required to pay the employee or other person an 20 amount set by the director or a court sufficient to compensate 21 the employee or other person and to deter future violations, 22 but not less than one hundred fifty dollars for each day that 23 the violation occurred. 24 Sec. 10. Section 91A.12, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 25 amended to read as follows: 26 1. Any employer who violates the provisions of this chapter 27 or the rules promulgated under it shall be subject to a civil 28 money penalty of not more than five hundred dollars per pay 29 period for each violation. The director may shall recover such 30 civil money penalty according to the provisions of subsections 31 2 through 5 . Any civil money penalty recovered shall be 32 deposited in the general fund of the state. 33 2. The director may shall propose that an employer be 34 assessed a civil money penalty by serving the employer with 35 -5- LSB 5909XS (2) 91 je/js 5/ 9 S.F. 2046 notice of such proposal in the same manner as an original 1 notice is served under the rules of civil procedure. Upon 2 service of such notice, the proposed assessment shall be 3 treated as a contested case under chapter 17A . However, an 4 employer must request a hearing within thirty days of being 5 served. 6 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 91A.12A Inadvertent violations. 7 If an employer inadvertently violates the provisions of 8 this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, 9 the employer shall not be subject to liability to an employee 10 pursuant to section 91A.8, the violation shall not constitute 11 an enforceable claim as provided in section 91A.10, and the 12 employer shall not be subject to a civil money penalty pursuant 13 to section 91A.12, if all of the following conditions are met: 14 1. The director determines that the violation was 15 inadvertent and that the employer attempted in good faith 16 to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules 17 adopted pursuant to this chapter. 18 2. The director, after considering any history of 19 violations of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to 20 this chapter by the employer, determines that the violation was 21 isolated in nature. 22 3. The employer corrects the violation to the satisfaction 23 of the director within fourteen days of the occurrence of the 24 violation. 25 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 91A.16 Commissions earned date. 26 An employer shall not require that a person be a current 27 employee to be paid a commission that the person otherwise 28 earned. 29 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 91A.17 Inconsistency with federal 30 law. 31 A provision of this chapter shall not apply to any employer 32 or employee if such provision would conflict with federal law 33 or regulation. 34 Sec. 14. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 35 -6- LSB 5909XS (2) 91 je/js 6/ 9 S.F. 2046 effect January 1, 2027. 1 DIVISION II 2 NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS 3 Sec. 15. NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS. The director of the 4 department of inspections, appeals, and licensing shall provide 5 for the notification of each employer in this state of the 6 requirements for employers provided in this Act by September 7 1, 2026. Such notification shall include suggested forms and 8 procedures that employers may use for purposes of compliance 9 with the notice and recordkeeping requirements of section 10 91A.6, as amended by this Act. 11